West Virginia, session 2026, SB616.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: CHAPTER 30. PROFESSIONS AND OCCUPATIONS. ARTICLE 42. WEST VIRGINIA CONTRACTOR LICENSING ACT. §30-42-1. Short title. [Repealed.] §30-42-2. Policy declared. [Repealed.] §30-42-3. Definitions. [Repealed.] §30-42-4. West Virginia Contractor Licensing Board created; members; appointment; terms; vacancies; qualifications; quorum. [Repealed.] §30-42-5. Administrative duties and powers of the board; rules. [Repealed.] §30-42-6. Necessity for license; exemptions. [Repealed.] §30-42-7. Application for and Issuance of License. [Repealed.] §30-42-8. Licenses; Expiration Date; Fees; Renewal. [Repealed.] §30-42-9. Unlawful Use, Assignment, Transfer of License; Revocation. [Repealed.] §30-42-10. Prerequisites to Obtaining Building Permit; Mandatory Written Contracts. [Repealed.] §30-42-11. Informational List for Basic Universal Design Features. [Repealed.] §30-42-12. Notice Included with Invitations to Bid and Specifications. [Repealed.] §30-42-13. License Renewal, Lapse, and Reinstatement. [Repealed.] §30-42-14. Violation of Article; Injunction; Criminal Penalties. [Repealed.] §30-42-15. Disciplinary Powers of the Board. [Repealed.] §30-42-16. Rules. [Repealed.] §30-42-17. Record Keeping. [Repealed.] §30-42-18. Reciprocity. [Repealed.] §30-42-19. Board Authorized to Provide Training. [Repealed.] §30-42-20. Nonapplicability of Local Ordinances; Exclusive License. [Repealed.]